Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

Sovereignty and Jurisdiction

4-1-101. Sovereignty coextensive with boundary.

The sovereignty and jurisdiction of the state is coextensive with the boundaries of the state, but the extent of such jurisdiction over places that have been or may be ceded to the United States is qualified by the terms of such cession.

Code 1858, § 70; Shan., § 82; Code 1932, § 96; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-101.

Cross-References. Acts ceding jurisdiction to federal government left unrepealed, §1-2-105.

Jurisdiction of criminal offenses, title 40, ch. 1.

Residents of areas ceded to federal government entitled to vote, §2-2-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., State, § 4.

4-1-102. Protection of territory.

The governor and all subordinate officers of this state are empowered to protect the territory of this state, within its defined limits in all the courts of the country, and the governor may employ counsel for this purpose whenever, in the governor's judgment, it becomes necessary in order to protect this state and the citizens of the commonwealth against illegal encroachments upon their rights, the fee for such services to be fixed by the governor and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1889, ch. 222, § 2; Shan., § 81; Code 1932, § 95; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-104.

4-1-103. Concurrent jurisdiction of boundary waters.

This state has concurrent jurisdiction on the waters of any river that forms a common boundary between this and any other state.

Code 1858, § 72; Shan., § 84; Code 1932, § 97; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-102.

Cross-References. County boundary waters, §5-1-102.

4-1-104. Mississippi River — Criminal jurisdiction.

The criminal jurisdiction of this state is extended as follows: Beginning at a point where the north boundary line of Tennessee intersects the east bank of the Mississippi River and extending west along a line in extension of and parallel to the north boundary of Tennessee to the west bank of the Mississippi River, in the state of Missouri; thence south along that bank, passing the line dividing the states of Missouri and Arkansas, and following the meanders of that river bank to a point on the west bank of that river where a line drawn east and parallel to the south boundary of Tennessee would intersect the west bank of the Mississippi River; thence east along that line to a point where the south boundary line of Tennessee intersects the east bank of the Mississippi River.

This state and her sister states, Arkansas and Missouri, have concurrent criminal jurisdiction over the parts of the territory lying opposite them and between the lines extending parallel to their north and south boundaries.

This section shall take effect as to the states of Arkansas and Missouri, or either of them, when these states, or either of them, pass a similar act governing the territory described in subsection (a), opposite them and between their north and south boundaries; this section to take effect from and after its passage as to all that part of the territory so described that is included within the boundaries east of the states of Arkansas and Missouri.

Acts 1915, ch. 123, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 80a1-80a3; Code 1932, §§ 92-94; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-103.

Cross-References. Boundary with Missouri and Arkansas, §4-2-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., State, § 8.

4-1-105. Retrocession of federal jurisdiction.

The consent of this state is hereby given to the retrocession of jurisdiction by the United States over land owned by the United States within the boundaries of this state, and the governor of this state is hereby authorized to accept for this state such retrocession of jurisdiction.

Retrocession of jurisdiction shall be effected by written notice by the principal officer of the agency of the United States having supervision and control over the land by metes and bounds and stating that legislative, executive and judicial jurisdiction is to be retroceded to this state and the filing of a statement of acceptance of jurisdiction by the governor of this state with the secretary of state of this state.

Acts 1975, ch. 266, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-121.

4-1-106. Federal application for cession of state jurisdiction.

Whenever the United States shall desire to acquire legislative jurisdiction over any lands within this state and shall make application for that purpose, the governor is authorized to cede to the United States such measure of jurisdiction, not exceeding that requested by the United States, as the governor may deem proper over all or any part of the lands as to which a cession of legislative jurisdiction is requested, reserving to the state such concurrent or partial jurisdiction as the governor may deem proper.

The application on behalf of the United States shall state in particular the measure of jurisdiction desired and shall be accompanied by an accurate description of the lands over which such jurisdiction is desired and information as to which of such lands are then owned or leased by the United States.

The cession of jurisdiction shall become effective when it is accepted on behalf of the United States, which acceptance shall be indicated, in writing upon the instrument of cession, by an authorized official of the United States and filing with the secretary of state.

Acts 1975, ch. 267, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-122.

Cross-References. Territory ceded to the United States government, Vol. 16, Index to Uncodified Public Chapters.

4-1-107. Jurisdiction reserved by state when cessions made to United States.

Notwithstanding any other law, there are reserved over any lands as to which any legislative jurisdiction may be ceded to the United States pursuant to §§4-1-106 —4-1-109, the state's entire legislative jurisdiction with respect to taxation and that of each state agency, county, city, political subdivision and public district of the state; the state's entire legislative jurisdiction with respect to marriage, divorce, annulment, adoption, commitment of the mentally incompetent, and descent and distribution of property; concurrent power to enforce the criminal law; and the power to execute any process, civil or criminal, issued under the authority of the state; nor shall any persons residing on such lands be deprived of any civil or political rights, including the right of suffrage, by reason of the cession of such jurisdiction to the United States.

Acts 1975, ch. 267, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-123.

4-1-108. Relinquishment of ceded legislative jurisdiction by United States.

Whenever the United States tenders to the state a relinquishment of all or part of the legislative jurisdiction theretofore acquired by it over lands within this state, the governor is authorized to accept on behalf of the state the legislative jurisdiction so relinquished.

The governor shall indicate the governor's acceptance of such relinquished legislative jurisdiction by a writing addressed to the head of the appropriate department or agency of the United States, and such acceptance shall be effective when the writing is deposited in the United States mails.

Acts 1975, ch. 267, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-124.

4-1-109. Cession or acceptance — Authority of local government.

When an acceptance or cession of jurisdiction as cited in §§4-1-106 —4-1-108 is sought for lands within this state concerning jurisdictional matters over which counties or municipalities, rather than the governor, have authority, agreements made under §§4-1-106 —4-1-108 shall be authenticated by the appropriate representative of the United States and the competent local authority, rather than by the governor, and shall be filed with the secretary of state.

Acts 1975, ch. 267, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-125.